Utah statutes.
58-74-501.   Unlawful conduct.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person not licensed in accordance with this
chapter to assume the title or use the abbreviation C.S.R. or C.V.R. or any
other similar words, letters, figures, or abbreviation to indicate that the
person using that title or abbreviation is a certified court reporter.
(2)  Violation of this provision is a class A misdemeanor.
